apertium-pl-sk.sk.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
  Slovakian monolingual dictionary for Apertium

  Partially based on information contained here:
  http://www.angelfire.com/sk3/quality/Slovak_declension.html

  The content of this Web site can be copied, translated and used, provided that the 
  address of this Web site is mentioned at the place, where the content is copied to, 
  translated to or used.
-->

<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AaÁáÄäBbCcČčDdĎďEeÉéFfGgHhIiÍíJjKkLlĽľĹĺMmNnŇňOoÓóÔôPpQqRrŔŕSsŠšTtŤťUuÚúVvWwXxYyÝýZzŽžĄąĆćĘęŁłŃńÓóŚśQqŻżŹź</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="perf"/>
    <sdef n="imperf"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="fut"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="ma"/>
    <sdef n="mi"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="hyd"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="cog"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="acc"/>
    <sdef n="ins"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="voc"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="apos"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="indecl"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="cpd"/>
    <sdef n="po"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="sint"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="ppr"/>
    <sdef n="emph"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="psv"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>
    <sdef n="act"/>
    <sdef n="impers"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="rom"/>
  </sdefs>
  
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>„</l>
          <r>„<s n="lquot"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>“</l>
          <r>“<s n="rquot"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>,</l>
          <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aposchar">
      <e>
        <i>'</i>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>’</l>
          <r>'</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <par n="aposchar"/>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ne">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>ne</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ne+">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>ne<s n="adv"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ne+i">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nej</l>
          <r>ne<s n="adv"/><j/>i</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nenaj+">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>ne<s n="adv"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>naj</l>
          <r>naj<s n="adv"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nenaj</l>
          <r>ne<s n="adv"/><j/>naj<s n="adv"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="ahoj__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="ij"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="že__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="preto__cnjadv">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kde__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kde__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="čo__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tu__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="adv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jej__det">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="adv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Britney__np">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="indecl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__bytie">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ia</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ím</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ia</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iam</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ia</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iach</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iami</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ia</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="jej"><i>jej</i><par n="jej__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ich"><i>ich</i><par n="jej__det"/></e>
    <e lm="jeho"><i>jeho</i><par n="jej__det"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="a__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ani"><i>ani</i><par n="a__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="aj"><i>aj</i><par n="a__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="než"><i>než</i><par n="a__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="alebo"><i>alebo</i><par n="a__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ale"><i>ale</i><par n="a__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="i"><i>i</i><par n="a__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="či"><i>či</i><par n="a__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="preto"><i>preto</i><par n="preto__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="pretože"><i>pretože</i><par n="preto__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="lebo"><i>lebo</i><par n="preto__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="však"><i>však</i><par n="preto__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="ak"><i>ak</i><par n="preto__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="že"><i>že</i><par n="že__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="až"><i>až</i><par n="že__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="by"><i>by</i><par n="že__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="aby"><i>aby</i><par n="že__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="žeby"><i>žeby</i><par n="že__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ach"><i>ach</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="aha"><i>aha</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ó"><i>ó</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="kde"><i>kde</i><par n="kde__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ako"><i>ako</i><par n="kde__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kedy"><i>kedy</i><par n="kde__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="či"><i>či</i><par n="kde__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kde"><i>kde</i><par n="kde__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="čo"><i>čo</i><par n="čo__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="tu"><i>tu</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tiež"><i>tiež</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kedykoľvek"><i>kedykoľvek</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="betónovanie"><i>betónovanie</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bez nikotínu"><i>bez<b/>nikotínu</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aktuálne"><i>aktuálne</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="čoskoro"><i>čoskoro</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="eticky"><i>eticky</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="iba"><i>iba</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mechanicky"><i>mechanicky</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="organizačne"><i>organizačne</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jesť"><par n="ne+"/><i>je</i><par n="je/sť__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="volať"><par n="ne+"/><i>vol</i><par n="vol/ať__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mať"><par n="ne+"/><i>m</i><par n="m/ať__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="brať"><par n="ne+"/><i>b</i><par n="b/rať__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vedieť"><par n="ne+"/><i>v</i><par n="v/edieť__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="piť"><par n="ne+"/><i>pi</i><par n="pi/ť__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="musieť"><par n="ne+"/><i>mus</i><par n="mus/ieť__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="organizovať"><par n="ne+"/><i>organiz</i><par n="organiz/ovať__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="absorbovať"><par n="ne+"/><i>absorb</i><par n="organiz/ovať__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="existovať"><par n="ne+"/><i>exist</i><par n="organiz/ovať__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aberovať"><par n="ne+"/><i>aber</i><par n="organiz/ovať__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="budovať"><par n="ne+"/><i>bud</i><par n="organiz/ovať__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="Britney"><i>Britney</i><par n="Britney__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lynne"><i>Lynne</i><par n="Britney__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lynn"><i>Lynn</i><par n="Britney__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Irene"><i>Irene</i><par n="Britney__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mary"><i>Mary</i><par n="Britney__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Keri"><i>Keri</i><par n="Britney__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jamie"><i>Jamie</i><par n="Britney__np"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="cometa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="guionet"/></e>
    <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
    <e lm="and"><i>and</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="this"><i>this</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="br"><i>br</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ref"><i>ref</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="math"><i>math</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="sub"><i>sub</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="book"><i>book</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="tt"><i>tt</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
